District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Modification Nos. M004 and M008 to Contract No. DCRL-2024-D-
0073 with the All Pro All Services Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02), the Council approves Modification No.
M004 and proposed Modification No. M008 to Contract No. DCRL-2024-D-0073 with All Pro
All Services to provide school transportation services, and authorizes payment in the not-to-
exceed amount of $2,965,620 for the services received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override that veto), and shall remain in effect for no
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in
section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2